Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3682.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma Clean
Indoor Air Act".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-1527.10 of Title 63, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
Req. No. 16604 Page 1

1. "Cigar bar" means an establishment that exclusively occupies
an enclosed indoor space and is primarily engaged in the retail sale
of tobacco products for consumption by customers on the premises;
2. "Enclosed area" means a space with a roof and more than two
walls;
3. "Public place" means any enclosed area to which the public
is invited or permitted;
4. "Smoking" means cigarettes, cigars, pipes, and electronic
smoking devices, including but not limited to vapes; and
5. "Workplace" means any indoor area under the control of an
employer where employees perform duties.
B. Smoking shall be prohibited in all the following places:
1. Indoor workplaces, including but not limited to, offices and
factories;
2. Government buildings;
3. Restaurants and bars;
4. Public transportation;
5. Health care facilities;
6. Educational institutions;
7. Retail stores and malls; and
8. Sports arenas and stadiums.
C. Smoking shall be allowed:
1. In tobacco shops or cigar bars, with proper ventilation and
signage;
Req. No. 16604 Page 2

2. Private residences, unless used for childcare or health care
services;
3. Designated smoking rooms in hotels, with a limited
percentage of rooms; and
4. On tribal lands and reservations.
D. Establishments shall have clear signage stating "No smoking"
at entrances and throughout facilities.
E. The State Department of Health shall promulgate rules to
enforce the provisions of this act.
F. Local governments or municipalities may enact stricter
ordinances.
SECTION 3. REPEALER 63 O.S. 2021, Section 1-1527, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-16604 TJ 02/20/26








Req. No. 16604 Page 3